Nebraska statutes.
Section 1.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-119
Departments; investigations; power to compel testimony and produce documents.

Each department created by section 81-101 shall have power through its head, or any deputy, assistant, or employee, when authorized by him or her, to make a thorough investigation into all the books, papers, and affairs of any person, firm, or corporation when in the judgment of such department such examination is necessary to the proper performance of its duties and the efficient enforcement of the laws. Such department may subpoena witnesses to attend investigative hearings and have such witnesses bring with them books, accounts, and documents necessary for a thorough investigation. Such witnesses may be examined under oath. These powers shall not be used for criminal investigations.

Laws 1919, c. 190, § 24, p. 442;

C.S.1922, § 7265;

C.S.1929, § 81-123;

R.S.1943, § 81-119;

Laws 2008, LB952, § 1.
July 18, 2008